Utah statutes.
19-6-720.   Grants and donations -- Support for programs -- Priorities.

(1)  The division may solicit or request and receive gifts, grants, donations, and other assistance from any source. Funds or resources received shall be deposited in the account created in Section 19-6-719 and shall be appropriated to the division for the management of DIYer used oil under this part subject to priorities set in Subsection (2).

(2)  Appropriations received by the division shall be expended, as available, for the management of DIYer used oil under this part in the following order of priority:

(a)  first, division and board costs of implementation;

(b)  second, recycling incentive payments under Section 19-6-717;

(c)  third, public education programs;

(d)  fourth, awarding grants as funds are available for the establishment of the following, with emphasis on providing used oil collection facilities and programs in rural areas:

(i)  used oil collection centers; and

(ii)  curbside used oil collection programs, including costs of retrofitting trucks, curbside containers, and other costs of curbside collection programs; and

(e)  fifth, provide funding to local health departments for enforcement of the management of DIYer used oil under this part in coordination with the board.

(3)  In awarding grants under Subsection (2)(d), the board shall work with governmental entities in areas of the state where used oil collection centers are limited or do not exist, or where public access to the centers is limited, to promote the establishment of DIYer used oil collection centers.

